Nebraska, session 109, LB730.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB730 LB730
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Boy means an adolescent human male;
(b) Designate means to post signage or otherwise provide indication
at or near the entrance to the restroom or locker room that is readily
visible and states that the restroom or locker room is designated as one
of the following: For use by females, for use by males, single occupancy,
or for use by families;
(c) Female means an individual who naturally has, had, will have, or
would have, but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or unintentional
disruption, the reproductive system that at some point produces,
transports, and utilizes eggs for fertilization. Female includes a woman
and a girl;
(d) Girl means an adolescent human female;
(e) Male means an individual who naturally has, had, will have, or
would have, but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or unintentional
disruption, the reproductive system that at some point produces,
transports, and utilizes sperm for fertilization. Male includes a man and
a boy;
(f) Man means an adult human male;
(g) Public school means any public school offering instruction in
elementary or high school grades;
(h) Sex means an individual's sex, either male or female; and
(i) Woman means an adult human female.
(2) The governing body of a public school shall designate each group
restroom within each school building as one of the following: For use by
females, for use by males, single occupancy, or for use by families.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(b) of this section, the
governing body of a public school shall not:
(i) Allow a male to use a restroom designated for use by females; or
(ii) Allow a female to use a restroom designated for use by males.
(b) This subsection shall not apply to:
-2-

LB730 LB730
2026 2026
(i) An individual entering a restroom under the following
circumstances:
(A) Entrance for custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes so
long as such individual takes reasonable steps to ensure that no
individual of the opposite sex is in a state of undress prior to entering
the restroom; or
(B) Entrance to render emergency assistance; or
(ii) A parent or caregiver bringing a minor child or an individual
with a disability that is of the opposite sex of such parent or caregiver
into a restroom designated for such parent's or caregiver's sex.
(4) The governing body of a public school shall designate each
locker room within each school building as one of the following: For use
by females, for use by males, or single occupancy.
(5)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (5)(b) of this section, the
governing body of a public school shall not:
(i) Allow a male to enter or use a locker room designated for and
being used at such time by one or more females; or
(ii) Allow a female to enter or use a locker room designated for and
being used at such time by one or more males.
(b) This subsection shall not apply to an individual entering a
locker room under the following circumstances:
(i) Entrance for custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes so
long as such individual takes reasonable steps to ensure that no
individual of the opposite sex is in a state of undress prior to entering
the locker room;
(ii) Entrance to render emergency assistance; or
(iii) Entrance by a coach, athletic trainer, or other authorized
official or school employee so long as such individual takes reasonable
steps to ensure that no individual of the opposite sex is in a state of
undress prior to entering the locker room.
(6) An individual born with a diagnosis of a disorder or difference
-3-

LB730 LB730
2026 2026
in sex development shall have the relevant legal protections and
accommodations afforded under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act
of 1990, as amended.
(7)(a) The governing body of each public school shall adopt a policy
implementing this section. Such policy shall include provisions regarding
the conduct of visitors and the public.
(b) The governing body of a public school or any official or
employee of a public school shall not retaliate against any individual
for reporting in good faith a violation of this section or related rules,
regulations, or policies.
Sec. 2. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Boy means an adolescent human male;
(b) Designate means to post signage or otherwise provide indication
at or near the entrance to the restroom or locker room that is readily
visible and states that the restroom or locker room is designated as one
of the following: For use by females, for use by males, single occupancy,
or for use by families;
(c) Female means an individual who naturally has, had, will have, or
would have, but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or unintentional
disruption, the reproductive system that at some point produces,
transports, and utilizes eggs for fertilization. Female includes a woman
and a girl;
(d) Girl means an adolescent human female;
(e) Male means an individual who naturally has, had, will have, or
would have, but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or unintentional
disruption, the reproductive system that at some point produces,
transports, and utilizes sperm for fertilization. Male includes a man and
a boy;
(f) Man means an adult human male;
(g) Postsecondary educational institution means a university,
college, or community college located in Nebraska that is a member
-4-

LB730 LB730
2026 2026
institution of an accrediting body recognized by the United States
Department of Education;
(h) Sex means an individual's sex, either male or female; and
(i) Woman means an adult human female.
(2) The governing body of a public postsecondary educational
institution shall designate each group restroom within each school
building as one of the following: For use by females, for use by males,
single occupancy, or for use by families.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(b) of this section, the
governing body of a public postsecondary educational institution shall
not:
(i) Allow a male to use a restroom designated for use by females; or
(ii) Allow a female to use a restroom designated for use by males.
(b) This subsection shall not apply to:
(i) An individual entering a restroom under the following
circumstances:
(A) Entrance for custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes so
long as such individual takes reasonable steps to ensure that no
individual of the opposite sex is in a state of undress prior to entering
the restroom; or
(B) Entrance to render emergency assistance; or
(ii) A parent or caregiver bringing a minor child or an individual
with a disability that is of the opposite sex of such parent or caregiver
into a restroom designated for such parent's or caregiver's sex.
(4) The governing body of a public postsecondary educational
institution shall designate each locker room within each school building
as one of the following: For use by females, for use by males, or single
occupancy.
(5)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (5)(b) of this section, the
governing body of a public postsecondary educational institution shall
not:
-5-

LB730 LB730
2026 2026
(i) Allow a male to enter or use a locker room designated for and
being used at such time by one or more females; or
(ii) Allow a female to enter or use a locker room designated for and
being used at such time by one or more males.
(b) This subsection shall not apply to an individual entering a
locker room under the following circumstances:
(i) Entrance for custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes so
long as such individual takes reasonable steps to ensure that no
individual of the opposite sex is in a state of undress prior to entering
the locker room;
(ii) Entrance to render emergency assistance; or
(iii) Entrance by a coach, athletic trainer, or other authorized
official or school employee so long as such individual takes reasonable
steps to ensure that no individual of the opposite sex is in a state of
undress prior to entering the locker room.
(6) An individual born with a diagnosis of a disorder or difference
in sex development shall have the relevant legal protections and
accommodations afforded under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act
of 1990, as amended.
(7)(a) The governing body of each public postsecondary educational
institution shall adopt a policy implementing this section. Such policy
shall include provisions regarding the conduct of visitors and the
public.
(b) The governing body of a public postsecondary educational
institution or any official or employee of a public postsecondary
educational institution shall not retaliate against any individual for
reporting in good faith a violation of this section or related rules,
regulations, or policies.
Sec. 3. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Boy means an adolescent human male;
(b) Designate means to post signage or otherwise provide indication
-6-

LB730 LB730
2026 2026
at or near the entrance to the restroom or locker room that is readily
visible and states that the restroom or locker room is designated as one
of the following: For use by females, for use by males, single occupancy,
or for use by families;
(c) Female means an individual who naturally has, had, will have, or
would have, but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or unintentional
disruption, the reproductive system that at some point produces,
transports, and utilizes eggs for fertilization. Female includes a woman
and a girl;
(d) Girl means an adolescent human female;
(e) Male means an individual who naturally has, had, will have, or
would have, but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or unintentional
disruption, the reproductive system that at some point produces,
transports, and utilizes sperm for fertilization. Male includes a man and
a boy;
(f) Man means an adult human male;
(g) Sex means an individual's sex, either male or female;
(h) State agency means any department, agency, board, bureau, or
commission of the state or any other entity whose primary function is to
act as an instrumentality or agency of the state; and
(i) Woman means an adult human female.
(2) A state agency shall designate each group restroom within any
facility owned by the state as one of the following: For use by females,
for use by males, single occupancy, or for use by families.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(b) of this section, a
state agency shall not:
(i) Allow a male to use a restroom designated for use by females; or
(ii) Allow a female to use a restroom designated for use by males.
(b) This subsection shall not apply to:
(i) An individual entering a restroom under the following
circumstances:
-7-

LB730 LB730
2026 2026
(A) Entrance for custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes so
long as such individual takes reasonable steps to ensure that no
individual of the opposite sex is in a state of undress prior to entering
the restroom; or
(B) Entrance to render emergency assistance; or
(ii) A parent or caregiver bringing a minor child or an individual
with a disability that is of the opposite sex of such parent or caregiver
into a restroom designated for such parent's or caregiver's sex.
(4) A state agency shall designate each locker room within each
facility owned by the state as one of the following: For use by females,
for use by males, or single occupancy.
(5)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (5)(b) of this section, a
state agency shall not:
(i) Allow a male to enter or use a locker room designated for and
being used at such time by one or more females; or
(ii) Allow a female to enter or use a locker room designated for and
being used at such time by one or more males.
(b) This subsection shall not apply to an individual entering a
locker room under the following circumstances:
(i) Entrance for custodial, maintenance, or inspection purposes so
long as such individual takes reasonable steps to ensure that no
individual of the opposite sex is in a state of undress prior to entering
the locker room;
(ii) Entrance to render emergency assistance; or
(iii) Entrance by an authorized individual so long as such
individual takes reasonable steps to ensure that no individual of the
opposite sex is in a state of undress prior to entering the locker room.
(6) An individual born with a diagnosis of a disorder or difference
in sex development shall have the relevant legal protections and
accommodations afforded under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act
of 1990, as amended.
-8-

LB730 LB730
2026 2026
Sec. 4. Each state agency in the adoption and promulgation of
administrative rules and regulations, the enforcement of administrative
decisions, and the adjudication of disputes by administrative agencies
shall define an individual's sex as either a male or female.
-9-